Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
In General
§ 49-17-41.
Administrative appeals; appeals to chancery court; appeals to Supreme Court.

In addition to any other remedies that might now be available, any person or interested party aggrieved by any order of the commission or the executive director shall have a right to file a sworn petition with the commission within thirty (30) days after the order was issued setting forth the grounds and reasons for his complaint and asking for a hearing of the matter involved, provided that no hearing on the same subject matter shall have been previously held before the commission or its designated hearing officer. The commission shall thereupon fix the time and place of such hearing and shall notify the petitioners thereof. In such pending matters, the commission shall have the same full powers as to subpoenaing witnesses, administering oaths, examining witnesses under oath and conducting the hearing, as is now vested by law in the Mississippi Public Service Commission, as to hearings before it, with the additional power that the executive director may issue all subpoenas, both at the instance of the petitioner and of the commission. At such hearings the petitioner, and any other interested party, may offer, present witnesses and submit evidence.

Following such hearing, the final order of determination of the commission upon such matters shall be conclusive, unless the petitioner, or such other interested party appearing at the hearing, shall, within fifteen (15) days after the adjournment of the meeting at which said final order was made, appeal to the chancery court of the county where the hearing was held, or of the situs in whole or in part of the subject matter of the hearing by giving a cost bond with sufficient sureties, payable to the state in the sum of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), to be fixed in the order appealed from, to be filed with and approved by the executive director of the commission, who shall forthwith certify the same together with a certified copy of the record of the commission in the matter to the chancery court to which the appeal is taken, which shall thereupon become the record of the cause. An appeal to the chancery court as provided herein shall not stay the execution of an order of the commission. Any party aggrieved by an order of the commission may, within said fifteen (15) days after the adjournment of the commission meeting at which said final order was entered, petition the chancery court of the situs in whole or in part of the subject matter for an appeal with supersedeas, and the chancellor shall grant a hearing on said petition and upon good cause shown may grant said appeal with supersedeas; the appellant shall be required to post a bond with sufficient sureties according to law in an amount to be determined by the chancellor. Appeals shall be considered only upon the record as made before the commission. The chancery court shall always be deemed open for hearing of such appeals and the chancellor may hear the same in termtime or in vacation at any place in his district, and the same shall have precedence over all civil cases, except election contests. The chancery court shall review all questions of law and of fact. If no prejudicial error be found, the matter shall be affirmed and remanded to the commission for enforcement. If prejudicial error be found, the same shall be reversed and the chancery court shall remand the matter to the commission for appropriate action as may be indicated or necessary under the circumstances. Appeals may be taken from the chancery court to the Supreme Court in the manner as now required by law, except that if a supersedeas is desired by the party appealing to the chancery court he may apply therefor to the chancellor thereof, who shall award a writ of supersedeas, without additional bond, if in his judgment material damage is not likely to result thereby, but otherwise he shall require such supersedeas bond as he deems proper, which shall be liable to the state for such damage.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7106-128; Laws, 1966, ch. 258, § 18; Laws, 1972, ch. 505, § 15; Laws, 1987, ch. 332, § 6; Laws, 1988, ch. 312, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 49-17-42.
Consideration as “owner”; exemption from liability.

Any lender or holder who maintains indicia of ownership primarily to protect an interest in a property, facility, or other person, and who does not participate in the management of the property, facility, or other person, shall not be considered an owner or operator of that property, facility, or other person, nor liable under any pollution control or other environmental protection law, or any rule or regulation or written order of the commission in pursuance thereof, for the prevention, clean-up, removal, remediation or abatement of any pollution, hazardous waste or solid waste placed, released or dumped on, in, about or near the property, facility or other person or caused by any operator on or of the property, facility or other person.

This section shall apply to actions commenced by the commission or by third parties.

In implementing this section, the commission shall adopt regulations equivalent to those proposed by the United States Environmental Protection Agency for this purpose.

This section shall apply to all interests existing at the time of passage of this chapter and thereafter created, whether secured or unsecured.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 627, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 49-17-43.
Penalties.

Any person found by the commission violating any of the provisions of Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43, or any rule or regulation or written order of the commission in pursuance thereof or any condition or limitation of a permit, except a permit required under the Solid Wastes Disposal Law of 1974 (Sections 17-17-1 through 17-17-47), shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00), for each violation, such penalty to be assessed and levied by the commission after a hearing as provided hereinabove. Appeals from the imposition of the civil penalty may be taken to the chancery court in the same manner as appeals from orders of the commission. If the appellant desires to stay the execution of a civil penalty assessed by the commission, he shall give bond with sufficient resident sureties of one or more guaranty or surety companies authorized to do business in this state, payable to the State of Mississippi, in an amount equal to double the amount of any civil penalty assessed by the commission, as to which the stay of execution is desired, conditioned, if the judgment shall be affirmed, to pay all costs of the assessment entered against the appellant. Each day upon which a violation occurs shall be deemed a separate and additional violation.

Any person violating any provision of the Solid Wastes Disposal Law of 1974 (Sections 17-17-1 through 17-17-47), any rule or regulation made pursuant to that law, or any order issued by the commission under the authority of that law shall be subject to the penalties provided in Section 17-17-29.

In lieu of, or in addition to, the penalty provided in subsection (1) of this section, the commission shall have power to institute and maintain in the name of the state any and all proceedings necessary or appropriate to enforce the provisions of Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43, rules and regulations in force pursuant thereto, and orders and permits made and issued under those sections, in the appropriate circuit, chancery, county or justice court of the county in which venue may lie. The commission may obtain mandatory or prohibitory injunctive relief, either temporary or permanent, and in cases of imminent and substantial hazard or endangerment as set forth in Section 49-17-27, it shall not be necessary in such cases that the state plead or prove: (a) that irreparable damage would result if the injunction did not issue; (b) that there is no adequate remedy at law; or (c) that a written complaint or commission order has first been issued for the alleged violation.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of, or fails to perform any duty imposed by, Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43 or any rule or regulation issued hereunder, or who violates any order or determination of the commission promulgated pursuant to such sections, and causes the death of fish or other wildlife shall be liable, in addition to the penalties provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, to pay to the state an additional amount equal to the sum of money reasonably necessary to restock such waters or replenish such wildlife as determined by the commission after consultation with the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks. Such amount may be recovered by the commission on behalf of the state in a civil action brought in the appropriate county or circuit court of the county in which venue may lie.

Any person who owns or operates facilities which, through misadventure, happenstance or otherwise, cause pollution necessitating immediate remedial or clean-up action shall be liable for the cost of such remedial or clean-up action and the commission may recover the cost of same by a civil action brought in the circuit court of the county in which venue may lie. This penalty may be recovered in lieu of or in addition to the penalties provided in subsections (1), (2) and (3) of this section.

In the event of the necessity for immediate remedial or clean-up action, the commission may contract for same and advance funds from the Pollution Emergency Fund to pay the costs thereof, such advancements to be repaid to the Pollution Emergency Fund upon recovery by the commission as provided above.

It is unlawful for any person to: (a) discharge pollutants in violation of Section 49-17-29 or in violation of any condition or limitation included in a permit issued under Section 49-17-29 or (b) introduce pollutants into publicly owned treatment works in violation of pretreatment standards or in violation of toxic effluent standards; and, upon conviction thereof, such person shall be punished by a fine of not less than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) nor more than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) per day of violation.

All fines, penalties and other sums recovered or collected by the commission for and in behalf of the state under this section shall be deposited in the Pollution Emergency Fund established under this chapter, and the commission is authorized to receive and accept, from any funds and all available sources whatsoever, additional funds to be deposited in such fund and expended for the purpose of remedial, clean-up or abatement actions involving pollution of the land, air or waters of the state in violation of Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43, any rule or regulation or written order of the commission in pursuance thereof, or any condition or limitation of a permit.

In determining the amount of any penalty under this chapter, the commission shall consider at a minimum:

The willfulness of the violation;

Any damage to air, water, land or other natural resources of the state or their uses;

Costs of restoration and abatement;

Economic benefit as a result of noncompliance;

The seriousness of the violation, including any harm to the environment and any hazard to the health, safety and welfare of the public;

Past performance history; and

Whether the noncompliance was discovered and reported as the result of a voluntary self-evaluation. If a person discovers as a result of a voluntary self-evaluation, information related to noncompliance with an environmental law and voluntarily discloses that information to the department, commission or any employee thereof, the commission shall, to the greatest extent possible, reduce a penalty, if any, determined by the commission, except for economic benefit as a result of noncompliance, to a de minimis amount if all of the following are true:

The disclosure is made promptly after knowledge of the information disclosed is obtained by the person;

The person making the disclosure initiates the appropriate corrective actions and pursues those corrective actions with due diligence;

The person making the disclosure cooperates with the commission and the department regarding investigation of the issues identified in the disclosure;

The person is not otherwise required by an environmental law to make the disclosure to the commission or the department;

The information was not obtained through any source independent of the voluntary self-evaluation or by the department through observation, sampling or monitoring;

The noncompliance did not result in a substantial endangerment threatening the public health, safety or welfare or the environment; and

The noncompliance is not a repeat violation occurring at the same facility within a period of three (3) years. “Repeat violation” in this subparagraph means a second or subsequent violation, after the first violation has ceased, of the same statutory provision, regulation, permit condition, or condition in an order of the commission.

Any provisions of this section and chapter regarding liability for the costs of cleanup, removal, remediation or abatement of any pollution, hazardous waste or solid waste shall be limited as provided in Section 49-17-42 and rules adopted thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7106-127; Laws, 1966, ch. 258, § 17; Laws, 1972, ch. 505, § 14; Laws, 1973, ch. 402, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 327, § 10; Laws, 1981, ch. 528, § 18; Laws, 1988, ch. 311, § 4; Laws, 1991, ch. 334, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 627, § 6; Laws, 2003, ch. 301, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Jan. 20, 2003.).

§ 49-17-44.
Applicants for water pollution control permit required to provide bonds or security; acceptable forms of security; creation of Water Pollution Control Bond Forfeiture Fund.

The permit board may require any applicant for a water pollution control permit for the discharge of effluent from any sewer system certificated or required to be certificated by the Public Service commission to provide a bond or other acceptable financial security instrument payable to the Commission on Environmental Quality and conditioned upon full and satisfactory performance of the requirements of the Mississippi Air and Water Pollution Control Law and any water pollution control permit issued under that law. Any bond shall be executed by the permittee and a corporate surety licensed to do business in the state. The commission shall establish by regulation the acceptable forms of financial security and the amount of financial security required for the various types and sizes of facilities. The purpose of the bond or other financial security shall be the protection of the public health, welfare and the environment.

The commission may enter an order requiring forfeiture of the bond or other financial security, if the commission determines that:

The continued operation or lack of operation and maintenance of the facility covered by this section represents an imminent threat to the public health, welfare and the environment because the permittee is unable or unwilling to adequately operate and maintain the facility or the facility has been actually or effectively abandoned by the permittee;

Reasonable and practical efforts under the circumstances have been made to obtain corrective actions from the permittee; and

It does not appear that corrective actions can or will be taken within an appropriate time as determined by the commission.

The proceeds of any forfeiture shall be deposited into a special fund created in subsection (5) of this section and shall be used by the commission or any receiver appointed by the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County to address or correct the noncompliance at the facility or to continue operation and maintenance of the facility. The proceeds shall be in addition to any other funds otherwise appropriated to the department and may be expended under the authority of this section without additional action of the Legislature.

The commission shall file an annual report detailing the receipts and expenditure of the bond forfeiture fund with the Chairmen of the House and Senate Appropriation Committees.

If the commission finds that a facility has been abandoned or that services of a facility have been terminated, the commission may enter any orders regarding continued operations of that facility as it deems necessary to protect the public health, welfare and the environment.

There is created in the State Treasury a fund to be designated as the “Water Pollution Control Bond Forfeiture Fund.” Monies in the fund shall be used by the commission or any receiver appointed by the court to address or correct the noncompliance at the facility or to continue operation and maintenance of the facility for which the bond or other financial security was forfeited.

Expenditures may be made from the fund upon requisition by the executive director of the department.

The fund shall be treated as a special trust fund. Interest earned on the principal shall be credited by the Treasurer to the fund.

The fund may receive monies from any available public or private source, including, but not limited to, proceeds from bond or other financial security forfeitures, interest, and funds from other judicial actions.

An appeal from any decision of the commission under this section may be taken as provided in Section 49-17-41, Mississippi Code of 1972.

This section shall be applicable to new applications for water pollution control permits and to existing water pollution control permits upon application for reissuance or transfer of a permit.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 388, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 1997).

§ 49-17-44.1.
Petition for appointment of receiver to operate and manage abandoned or grossly mismanaged sewer systems.

If the commission determines that any privately owned sewer system that is certificated by the Public Service Commission and within its jurisdiction has been actually or effectively abandoned by its owner, or that its management is grossly inefficient or irresponsible, and the abandonment or management has created an environmental problem that endangers public health, the commission may petition the chancery court of any county wherein the privately-owned sewer system is located for an order attaching the assets of the privately-owned sewer system and placing such sewer system under the sole control and responsibility of a receiver. Any person served by the sewer system shall have standing to intervene in the chancery proceeding as an interested party. If the court determines that the petition is proper in all respects and finds, after a hearing thereon, the allegations contained in the petition are true, it shall order that the sewer system be placed in receivership. The court, in its discretion and in consideration of the recommendation of the commission, may appoint a receiver who shall be a responsible individual, partnership, corporation or political subdivision knowledgeable in sewer service affairs and who shall maintain control and responsibility for the operation and management of the affairs of such sewer system. The receiver shall operate the sewer system so as to preserve the assets of the sewer system and to serve the best interests of its customers while protecting public health and welfare and the environment. The receiver shall be compensated from the assets of the sewer system in an amount to be determined by the court. Control of and responsibility for the sewer system shall remain in the receiver until the court determines that it is in the best interests of the customers and the public interest that the sewer system be returned to the owner, transferred to another owner, or assumed by another sewer system or public service corporation. If the court, after hearing, determines that control of and responsibility for the affairs of the sewer system should not be returned to the legal owner thereof, the receiver may proceed to liquidate the assets of the sewer system in the manner provided by law. Mississippi laws and Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure generally applicable to receivership shall govern receiverships created under this section. Any new owner or operator of a sewer system transferred or liquidated by the receiver or the chancery court under this subsection shall obtain all necessary permits and approvals from the Permit Board, the Public Service Commission and any other applicable state or local agencies.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 487, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 27, 2002.).

§ 49-17-45.
Small Business Stationary Source Technical and Environmental Compliance Assistance program; Small Business Compliance Advisory Panel.

The Mississippi Commission on Environmental Quality, acting through the Department of Environmental Quality, shall establish and administer, in accordance with the Federal Clean Air Act, the Mississippi Small Business Stationary Source Technical and Environmental Compliance Assistance Program (PROGRAM).

There is created the Mississippi Small Business Compliance Advisory Panel. The Mississippi Small Business Compliance Advisory Panel shall consist of the following members, the term of each to be concurrent with the term of the appointing official of that member:

One (1) member representing the Air Pollution Control Program of the Department of Environmental Quality;

Two (2) members who are not owners or representatives of owners of a small business, appointed by the Governor;

Two (2) members who each shall be the owner or representatives of an owner of a small business, appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and

Two (2) members who each shall be the owner or representatives of an owner of a small business, appointed by the Lieutenant Governor.

The panel shall elect one (1) member to serve as chairman. The panel shall meet at the call of the chairman at Jackson, Mississippi, or such other places within the state designated by the panel; however, the panel shall not meet more than four (4) times during a calendar year.

Members of the Mississippi Small Business Compliance Advisory Panel shall serve without salary, but each shall be entitled to receive per diem as provided in Section 25-3-69 and his actual travel and hotel expenses incurred while in the performance of his duties as a member of the committee in accordance with Section 25-3-41. Per diem and expenses shall be paid on an itemized statement approved by the State Fiscal Officer from fees collected under Section 49-17-30.

The Mississippi Small Business Compliance Advisory Panel shall:

Render advisory opinions concerning:

The effectiveness of the Small Business Stationary Source Technical and Environmental Compliance Assistance Program;

Difficulties encountered; and

Degree and severity of enforcement;

Make periodic reports to the Administrator of the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency concerning the compliance of the State Small Business Stationary Source Technical and Environmental Compliance Assistance Program with the requirements of the federal Paperwork Reduction Act, the federal Regulatory Flexibility Act, and the federal Equal Access to Justice Act;

Review information for small business stationary sources to assure such information is understandable by the layperson; and

Have the Small Business Stationary Source Technical and Environmental Compliance Assistance Program serve as the secretariat for the development and dissemination of such reports and advisory opinions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 611, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 1993).